el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ξύλινων πνευστών οργάνων > Αξεσουάρ κλαρινέτου > Σφιγκτήρες & καπάκια κλαρινέτου: Μεταλλικοί σφιγκτήρες & καπάκια; Σφιγκτήρες & καπάκια Rovner; Κανονικοί σφιγκτήρες & καπάκια
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện cho nhạc cụ hơi > Phụ kiện kèn clarinet > Dây buộc và nắp đậy kèn clarinet: Dây buộc và nắp đậy kim loại; Dây buộc và nắp đậy Rovner; Dây buộc và nắp đậy tiêu chuẩn
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Fafúvóshangszer-kiegészítők > Klarinétkiegészítők > Klarinétligatúrák és -sapkák: Fém ligatúrák és kupakok; Rovner ligatúrák és kupakok; Szabványos ligatúrák és sapkák
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za drvena puhačka glazbala > Pribor za klarinet > Ligature i poklopci za klarinet: Metalne ligature i poklopci; Rovner ligature i poklopci; Standardne ligature i kape
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till träblåsinstrument > Klarinettillbehör > Klarinettligatur och klaffar: Metallligaturer och lock; Rovner-ligaturer och lock; Standardligaturer och lock
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 木管樂器配件 > 單簧管配件 > 單簧管束圈: 金屬束圈; Rovner 束圈; 標準束圈
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor houten blaasinstrumenten > Accessoires voor klarinet > Ligaturen en caps voor klarinet: Metalen ligaturen en caps; Rovner-ligaturen en -caps; Standaard ligaturen en caps
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til treblåseinstrumenter > Klarinettilbehør > Klarinettligaturer og -hetter: Metalligaturer og -hetter; Rovner-ligaturer og -hetter; Standardligaturer og -hetter
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่า > อุปกรณ์คลาริเน็ต > ที่รัดและปลอกคลาริเน็ต: ที่รัดและปลอกโลหะ; ที่รัดและปลอกโรฟเนอร์; ที่รัดและปลอกมาตรฐาน
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych drewnianych > Akcesoria do klarnetów > Ligatury i osłonki ustników do klarnetów: Metalowe Ligatury i osłonki ustników; Ligatury i osłonki ustników Rovner; Standardowe ligatury i osłonki ustników
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Dřevěné dechové nástroje – příslušenství > Klarinety – příslušenství > Ligatury a kloboučky pro klarinety: Kovové ligatury a kloboučky; Ligatury a kloboučky Rovner; Standardní ligatury a kloboučky
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 木管楽器用品 > クラリネット用品 > クラリネット用リガチャー・キャップ: メタルリガチャー・キャップ; ロヴナーリガチャー・キャップ; 標準リガチャー・キャップ
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de viento-madera > Accesorios para clarinete > Abrazaderas y boquilleros para clarinete: Abrazaderas y boquilleros de metal; Abrazaderas y boquilleros rovner; Abrazaderas y boquilleros estándar
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente de suflat > Accesorii pentru clarinet > Ligaturi și capace pentru clarinet: Ligaturi și capace metalice; Ligaturi și capace Rovner; Ligaturi și capace standard
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Puupuhallintarvikkeet > Klarinettitarvikkeet > Klarinetin lehdenkiristimet ja suojat: Metalliset lehdenkiristimet ja suojat; Rovner-lehdenkiristimet ja suojat; Tavalliset lehdenkiristimet ja suojat
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Træblæserinstrumenter – tilbehør > Klarinet – tilbehør > Klarinet – ligaturer og hætter: Metal – ligaturer og hætter; Rovner – ligaturer og hætter; Standard – ligaturer og hætter
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za lesna pihala > Dodatki za klarinet > Ligature in pokrovčki za klarinet: Kovinske ligature in pokrovčki; Rovner ligature in pokrovčki; Standardne ligature in pokrovčki
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для деревянных духовых инструментов > Аксессуары для кларнетов > Лигатуры и колпачки для кларнетов: Металлические лигатуры и колпачки; Лигатуры и колпачки Rovner; Стандартные лигатуры и колпачки
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 木管乐器配件 > 单簧管配件 > 单簧管卡帽: 金属卡帽; 瑞夫纳卡帽; 标准卡帽
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Woodwind Instrument Accessories > Clarinet Accessories > Clarinet Ligatures & Caps: Metal Ligatures & Caps; Rovner Ligatures & Caps; Standard Ligatures & Caps
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour instruments à vent > Accessoires pour clarinettes > Ligatures et bouchons pour clarinettes: Ligatures et bouchons en métal; Ligatures et bouchons Rovner; Ligatures et bouchons standards
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per legni > Accessori per clarinetto > Legature e cappucci clarinetto: Legature e cappucci in metallo; Legature e cappucci Rovner; Legature e cappucci standard
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de madeiras > Acessórios para clarinete > Abraçadeiras e tapa boquilhas para clarinete: Abraçadeiras e tapa boquilhas de metal; Abraçadeiras e tapa boquilhas Rovner; Abraçadeiras e tapa boquilhas padrão
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Klarnet Aksesuarları > Klarnet Bilezik ve Kapakları: Metal Bilezik ve Kapaklar; Rovner Bilezik ve Kapaklar; Standart Bilezik ve Kapaklar
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Holzblasinstrumente > Klarinettenzubehör > Blattschrauben & Kappen für Klarinetten: Metallblattschrauben & -kappen; Rovner-Blattschrauben & -Kappen; Standardblattschrauben & -kappen
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Medinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Klarnetų priedai > Klarnetų ligatūros ir dangteliai: Metalinės ligatūros ir dangteliai; „Rovner“ ligatūros ir dangteliai; Standartinės ligatūros ir dangteliai
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за дървени духови инструменти > Аксесоари за кларинет > Лигатури и капачки за кларинет: Метални лигатури и капачки за кларинет; Лигатури и капачки Rovner; Стандартни лигатури и капачки
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de madeira > Acessórios para clarinete > Ligaduras e tampas para clarinete: Ligaduras e tampas metálicas; Ligaduras e tampas Rovner; Ligaduras e tampas padrão
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 목관악기 부대용품 > 클라리넷 부대용품 > 클라리넷 리가처/캡: 금속 리가처/캡; 로브너 리가처/캡; 스탠다드 리가처/캡
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre drevené dychové nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre klarinet > Ligatúry pre klarinet: Kovové ligatúry; Ligatúry Rovner; Štandardné ligatúry